Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6828
Applicability of act.

The Managed Care Emergency Services Act applies to all health carriers that offer managed care plans.

Laws 1997, LB 279, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 44-6820;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 20.